Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 9 Charitable Trusts

53-12-170.
Definition; charitable purposes.

A charitable trust is a trust in which the settlor provides that the trust property shall be used exclusively for charitable purposes.

Charitable purposes shall include:

The relief of poverty;

The advancement of education;

The advancement of ethics and religion;

The advancement of health;

The advancement of science and the arts and humanities;

The protection and preservation of the environment;

The improvement, maintenance, or repair of cemeteries, other places of disposition of human remains, and memorials;

The prevention of cruelty to animals;

Governmental purposes; and

Other similar subjects having for their object the relief of human suffering or the promotion of human civilization.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-170

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-80/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, inserted “exclusively” in subsection (a) and deleted former subsection (c), which read: “If the settlor provides for both charitable and noncharitable purposes, the provisions relating to the charitable purposes shall be governed by this article.”.

Law reviews.

For comment on Creech v. Scottish Rite Hosp. for Crippled Children,

211 Ga. 195

,

84 S.E.2d 563

(1954), see
17 Ga. B.J. 512 (1955).

For note on discriminatory charitable trusts in Georgia, with regard to application of the cy pres doctrine, in light of Evans v. Newton, 382 U.S. 296,

86 S. Ct. 486

,

15 L. Ed. 2

d 373 (1966), see
6 Ga. St. B.J. 428 (1970).

For article, “The Rule Against Perpetuities as Applied to Georgia Wills and Trusts,” see 16 Ga. L. Rev. 235 (1982).

For article with annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (2021).

53-12-171.
Power to select purposes or beneficiaries.

The settlor of a charitable trust may retain the power to select the charitable purposes or charitable beneficiaries, or may grant the trustee or any other person the power to select charitable purposes or charitable beneficiaries or to engage in the charitable purposes, without rendering the trust void for indefiniteness.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-171

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-172.
Cy pres.

If a charitable trust or gift cannot be executed in the manner provided by the settlor or donor, the superior court shall exercise equitable powers in such a way as will as nearly as possible effectuate the intention of the settlor or donor.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-172

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

History of Code section.

This Code section is derived from the decision in Kelly v. Welborn,

110 Ga. 540

,

35 S.E. 636

(1900).

Law reviews.

For note on discriminatory charitable trusts in Georgia, with regard to application of the cy pres doctrine, in light of Evans v. Newton, 382 U.S. 296,

86 S. Ct. 486

,

15 L. Ed. 2

d 373 (1966), see
6 Ga. St. B.J. 428 (1970).

For article, “Private Trusts for the Provision of Private Goods,” see 37 Emory L.J. 295 (1988).

53-12-173.
Duration of charitable trusts.

A charitable trust shall be valid even though under the trust provisions it is to continue for an indefinite or unlimited period.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-173

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-174.
Attorney general or district attorney as representative of charitable beneficiaries.

In all cases in which the rights of beneficiaries under a charitable trust are involved, the Attorney General or the district attorney of the circuit in which the major portion of trust property lies shall represent the interests of the beneficiaries and the interests of this state as parens patriae in all legal matters pertaining to the administration and disposition of such trust. The Attorney General or the district attorney may bring or defend actions, and, insofar as an action of this nature may be deemed an action against the state, the state expressly gives its consent thereto. The venue of such actions may be in any county in this state in which a substantial number of persons who are the beneficiaries of the trust reside. Process shall be directed to the Attorney General or to the district attorney of the circuit in which the major portion of the trust property lies. Service may be perfected by mailing a copy of the petition and process by the clerk of the superior court of the county in which it is filed to the Attorney General or to the district attorney of the circuit in which the major portion of the trust property lies. Any judgment determining rights under any charitable trusts shall be binding on the beneficiaries if the Attorney General or the district attorney of the circuit in which the major portion of the trust property lies is a party and is served as provided in this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-174

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

Cross references.

Provisions regarding exemption of financial institutions from fiduciary bond or security requirements, §

7-1-311

.

Bond requirements for testamentary guardians, §

29-4-3

.

Law reviews.

For note on discriminatory charitable trusts in Georgia, with regard to application of the cy pres doctrine, in light of Evans v. Newton, 382 U.S. 296,

86 S. Ct. 486

,

15 L. Ed. 2

d 373 (1966), see
6 Ga. St. B.J. 428 (1970).

For note discussing problems with venue in Georgia, and proposing statutory revisions to improve the resolution of venue questions, see 9 Ga. St. B.J. 254 (1972).

53-12-175.
Enforcement by settlor.

The settlor of a charitable trust may maintain a civil action to enforce the trust.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-175

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.